es: Tipo de fijaciones de botas: Boa; Hipervínculo; Hebilla de liberación rápida; Correa de trinquete; Entrada rápida; De entrar; Con correas; Con correas de cinta; Otros
th: ประเภทการผูกรองเท้า: BOA; ไฮเปอร์ลิงก์; หัวเข็มขัดแบบปลดเร็ว; สายรัดโพลีเอสเตอร์; สายรัดแบบเข้าเร็ว; ประกอบ; รัดเข้า; สายรัดแบบสลิงแบน; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di allacciatura della scarpa: Boa; Hyperlink; Chiusura a sgancio rapido; Chiusura a cricchetto; Calzata rapida; Step-in; Strap-in; Chiusura in tessuto; Altro
sk-SK: Typ viazania topánok: Boa; Hypertextový odkaz; Rýchloupínacia pracka; Upínací popruh; Rýchly vstup; Pripevnenie vpredu aj vzadu; Pripevnenie vpredu na remienok; Extra pevný popruh; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta vezave čevljev: Boa; Hiperpovezava; Zaponka za hitro sprostitev; Povezovalni trak; Hiter vstop; Pripenjanje; Povezovalni trak, dvodelni; Tkan trak; Drugo
lt-LT: Batų tvirtinimo tipas: Boa; Hipersaitas; Greito atsegimo sagtis; Tvirtinimo diržas; Greitas įsimovimas; Automatinės; Prisegamos; Pintas dirželis; Kita
vi: Kiểu gắn giày: Núm dây xoay; Siêu liên kết; Khóa tháo nhanh; Dây đai khóa ratchet; Khóa mang vào nhanh; Khóa bước vào; Khóa dây đai; Khóa dây đai vải; Khác
ko: 신발 묶기 유형: 보아; 하이퍼링크; 퀵 릴리스 버클; 래칫 스트랩; 빠른 입장; 스텝인; 스트랩인; 웨빙 스트랩; 기타
ru: Тип крепления обуви: Боа; Гиперссылка; Быстросъемная пряжка; Ремешок с храповым механизмом; Быстрое надевание; Надевающийся; Пристегивающийся; Ленточный ремень; Другое
zh-TW: 鞋固定器類型: 防護鞋; 超連結; 快拆扣; 棘輪帶; 套入式; 穿入式; 綁帶式; 織帶; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fixador de sapatos: Boa; Hiperligação; Fivela de abertura rápida; Fita de catraca; Entrada rápida; Entrada; Com tira; Correias; Outro
nb: Skobindingstype: Boa; Hyperkobling; Stropper med hurtigfeste; Skrallestropp; Hastighetsinngang; Stig-inn; Stropp på; Båndstropp; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de cadarço: Boa; Hiperlink; Fivela de liberação rápida; Correia de catraca; Entrada rápida; Sem cadarço; Com velcro; Alça de tecido; Outro
tr: Ayakkabı Bağlama Tipi: Otriş; Köprü; Çabuk çıkarılabilir toka; Mandal kayışı; Hızlı giriş; İçeri sokma; Askılı; Dokuma kayışı; Diğer
el: Τύπος στερέωσης παπουτσιού: Βοάς; Υπερσύνδεσμος; Πόρπη γρήγορης απελευθέρωσης; Ιμάντας καστάνιας; Εισαγωγή ταχύτητας; Φορετό; Δετό; Ιμάντας με ιμάντες; Άλλο
ja: スノーシューのバインディングタイプ: ボア; ハイパーリンク; サイドリリースバックル; ラチェットストラップ; スピードエントリー; ステップイン; ストラップイン; ウェビングストラップ; その他
sv: Skobindningstyp: Boa; Hyperlink; Snabbspänne; Spärrrem; Hastighetsinträde; Insteg; Spänna fast; Stropp; Övrigt
de: Schuhbindungstyp: Boa; Hyperlink; Sicherheitsschnalle; Ratschengurt; Schnelleinstieg; Step-in; Strap-in; Gewebeband; Sonstiges
en: Shoe binding type: Boa; Hyperlink; Quick release buckle; Ratchet strap; Speed entry; Step-in; Strap-in; Webbing strap; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta veza: Boa; Hiperveza; Kopča za brzo otpuštanje; Traka za stezanje; Brzo obuvanje; Step-in; Zatezanje; Traka za vezivanje; Ostalo
cs: Typ zapínání boty: Boa; Hypertextový odkaz; Rychloupínací přezka; Ráčnový popruh; Rychlostní vstup; Vstup bez vázání; Zapínání na popruh; Popruh; Jiné
pl: Typ szycia butów: Boa; Hiperłącze; Klamra szybkiego zwalniania; Pas zapadkowy; Wpis prędkości; Wkroczenie; Mocowanie taśmy; Pas parciany; Inne
hu: Cipőrögzítés típusa: Boa; Hyperlink; Gyors kioldócsat; Racsnis heveder; Sebességbevitel; Belépős; Becsatolós; Pántszalag; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип завързване на обувки: Боа; Хипервръзка; Катарама за бързо освобождаване; С лепка; Бързо обуване; Без връзки; С каишка; Тъкана лента; Други
ro-RO: Tipul de legături pentru încălțăminte: Boa; Hyperlink; Cataramă cu eliberare rapidă; Curea cu clichet; Speed entry; Step-in; Strap-in; Curea cu chingă; Altele
da: Skobindingstype: Boa; Hyperlink; Hurtigudløserspænde; Skralderem; Hurtig indgang; Træd-i; Strop-i; Netstrop; Andet
fi: Kengänsidontatapa: Boa; Hyperlinkki; Pikalukitussolki; Kuormaliina; Pikakäyttö; Pujotettava; Strap-in; Punoshihna; Muu
zh-CN: 鞋固定类型: Boa; 超级链接; 快速松紧鞋带扣; 拉紧带; 快速录入; 踩入式; 束带; 螺纹织带; 其他
nl: Schoenbindingstype: Boa; Hyperlink; Snelsluiting; Ratelband; Speed entry; Instap; Strap-in; Riem van webbing; Andere
fr: Type de fixation de la chaussure: Boa; Hyperlink; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Sangle à cliquet; Fixation rapide; Fixation; Attache de strap; A sangle; Autre